Tennessee, session 114, SB0670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 69, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The department shall not apply criteria that will result in the classification of real
property as a wetland, or otherwise regulate real property as a wetland, if the real
property is not classified and regulated as a wetland under federal law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0670
002541
- 1 -